Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20183-164
Property of Department of Aeronautics; transfer to Division of Aeronautics; appropriation and salary limit; how treated.

On July 1, 2017, all items of property, real and personal, including office furniture and fixtures, books, documents, and records of the Department of Aeronautics pertaining to the duties and functions transferred to the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation pursuant to Laws 2017, LB339, shall become the property of such division.

Any appropriation and salary limit provided in any legislative bill enacted by the One Hundred Fifth Legislature, First Session, to Agency No. 17, Department of Aeronautics, in the following program classifications, shall be null and void, and any such amounts are hereby appropriated to Agency No. 27, Department of Transportation: Program No. 26, Administration and Services; Program No. 301, Public Airports; and Program No. 596, State-Owned Aircraft. Any financial obligations of the Department of Aeronautics that remain unpaid as of June 30, 2017, and that are subsequently certified as valid encumbrances to the accounting division of the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to sections 81-138.01 to 81-138.04, shall be paid by the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation from the unexpended balance of appropriations existing in such program classifications on June 30, 2017.

Laws 2017, LB339, § 54.